Massachusetts, session 194th, H5103.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There shall be an exemption from the property tax for each qualifying 
parcel of real property classified as class 1 residential in the town of Reading in an amount to be 
set annually by the select board as provided in section 3. The exemption shall be applied only to 
the domicile of the taxpayer; provided, however, that for the purposes of this act, “parcel” shall 
mean a unit of real property as defined by the board of assessors under the deed for the property 
and shall include a condominium unit. The exemption provided for in this act shall be in addition 
to any and all other exemptions allowed by the General Laws. 
SECTION 2. The board of assessors in the town of Reading may deny an application if 
they find the applicant has excessive assets that place the applicant outside of the intended 
recipients of the exemption under this act. Real property shall qualify for the exemption under 
section 1 if:  

of 3 12  (i) the qualifying real property is owned and occupied by a person whose prior year’s 
income would make the person eligible for the circuit breaker income tax credit under subsection 
(k) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws;  
(ii) the qualifying real property is owned by a single applicant not less than 65 years 
old at the close of the previous year or jointly by persons either of whom is not less than 65 years 
old at the close of the previous year and the other joint applicant is not less than 60 years old;  
(iii) the qualifying real property is owned and occupied by the applicant or joint 
applicants as their domicile;  
(iv) the applicant or at least 1 of the joint applicants has been domiciled and owned a 
home in the town for not less than 10 consecutive years before filing an application for the 
exemption;  
(v) the maximum assessed value of the qualifying real property is no greater than the 
prior year’s maximum assessed value for qualification for the circuit breaker income tax credit 
under subsection (k) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws as adjusted annually by the 
department of revenue; and  
(vi) the board of assessors has approved the application. 
SECTION 3. The select board of the town of Reading, shall annually set the exemption 
amount under section 1 between 100 per cent and 150 per cent of the amount of the circuit 
breaker income tax credit under subsection (k) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws for 
which the applicant qualified in the previous year, set annually by the Board of Assessors. The 

of 3 32 total amount exempted by this act shall be allocated proportionally within the tax levy on all 
residential taxpayers. 
SECTION 4. A person who seeks to qualify for the exemption under section 1 shall, 
before the deadline established by the board of assessors of the town of Reading, file an 
application, on a form to be adopted by the board, with supporting documentation relative to the 
applicant’s income and assets as described in the application. The application shall be filed each 
year for which the applicant seeks the exemption. 
SECTION 5. No exemption shall be granted under this act until the department of 
revenue certifies a residential tax rate for the applicable tax year where the total exemption 
amount is raised by a burden shift within the residential tax levy. 
SECTION 6. This act shall expire 3 years after implementation of the exemption under 
this act.